Maine, session 132, LD1398.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15672, sub-§1-E is enacted to read:
1-E. Clinical mental health provider. "Clinical mental health provider" means a
licensed clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed alcohol
and drug counselor or licensed pastoral counselor.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15672, sub-§27-A is enacted to read:
27-A. School counselor. "School counselor" has the same meaning as in section 4008,
subsection 1, paragraph B.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15679, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§33, is further amended to read:
A. For the elementary school level and the middle school level:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2017, the student-to-education technician ratio is 114:1 for
the elementary school level and 312:1 for the middle school level;
(2) The student-to-guidance staff ratio is 350:1;
(3) The student-to-librarian ratio is 800:1;
(4) The student-to-media assistant ratio is 500:1;
(5) The student-to-health staff ratio is 800:1;
(6) The student-to-school administrative staff ratio is 305:1; and
(7) The student-to-clerical staff ratio is 200:1.;
(8) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the student-to-clinical mental health
provider ratio is 350:1 and beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the
student-to-clinical mental health provider ratio is 250:1; and
(9) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the student-to-school counselor ratio
is 250:1.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §15679, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. C,
§33, is further amended to read:
B. For the high school level:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2017, the student-to-education technician ratio is 316:1;
(2) The student-to-guidance staff ratio is 250:1;
(3) The student-to-librarian ratio is 800:1;
(4) The student-to-media assistant ratio is 500:1;
(5) The student-to-health staff ratio is 800:1;
(6) The student-to-school administrative staff ratio is 315:1; and
(7) The student-to-clerical staff ratio is 200:1.;
(8) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, the student-to-clinical mental health
provider ratio is 350:1 and beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the
student-to-clinical mental health provider ratio is 250:1; and
Page 1 - 132LR1829(01)

(9) Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the student-to-school counselor ratio
is 250:1.